Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,179
Endowed scholarship funds; use; purpose.

(1) All funds appropriated by the Legislature for the Student Diversity Scholarship Program Act shall be used to support endowed scholarship funds which shall be held, managed, and invested as authorized by section 72-1246 with only the income therefrom expended for scholarships.

(2) The purpose of such endowed scholarship funds is to provide total or partial undergraduate scholarships for tuition, fees, board and room, and books at all campuses of the University of Nebraska, the state colleges, and the community colleges to full-time undergraduate students who fulfill the criteria for award of a student diversity scholarship and who cannot afford such educational expenses due to lack of financial resources available to them.

Laws 2000, LB 1379, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB342, § 34.